Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
CHAPTER 150 Fish and Wildlife Resources
150.097.
Indemnification by the Commonwealth of conservation officer who is sued in his or her individual capacity and personally suffers financial loss — Indemnification contingent upon findings that the act or omission which resulted in liability was lawful and proper and within the officer’s scope and course of employment — Indemnification does not abrogate, limit, or constitute a waiver of any privilege, immunity, or matter of defense otherwise available to the conservation officer.

Any conservation officer who is sued for any act or omission in the line of duty and who has a judgment for monetary damages rendered against him or her in his or her individual capacity, and who personally suffers actual financial loss, unreimbursed from any source, by the enforcement and satisfaction of the judgment, including any costs or attorney fees awarded pursuant thereto, shall be indemnified by the Commonwealth, from funds appropriated to the fish and game fund for the payment of judgments, to the extent of his or her actual financial loss.

The indemnification shall be contingent upon an express determination by the commissioner that the act or omission which resulted in liability was within the scope and course of employment of the conservation officer, and occurred during the performance of duty, and was committed or omitted in the good faith belief that the act or omission was lawful and proper.

The indemnification shall not be construed to abrogate or limit any privilege, immunity, or matter of defense otherwise available to the conservation officer and shall not constitute a waiver of any privilege, immunity, or matter of defense, including the sovereign immunity of the Commonwealth.

HISTORY:
2019 ch. 167, § 3, effective June 27, 2019.

150.100.
Execution of process by commissioner, department personnel and persons appointed by commissioner.

The commissioner, all personnel of the department and all officers and other persons appointed by the commissioner may execute any process issued by a court, enforcing the provisions of this chapter or any law relating to the propagation or protection of fish and wildlife in the same manner as any constable or sheriff. To accomplish that purpose they may call any peace officer or other person to their aid.

History.
1954d-23: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 10; 1952, ch. 200, § 16.

150.105.
Destruction or control of animals causing damage.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the commissioner may, with the approval of the commission, authorize conservation officers or any other persons to destroy or bring under control in such manner as he deems necessary any wild animal, fish or wild birds, protected or unprotected which are causing damage to persons, property or other animals, fish or birds or spreading diseases and which in his judgment should be eliminated or controlled to prevent further damage.

History.
Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 6, § 1; 1952, ch. 200, § 17; 1956, ch. 115, § 8, effective May 18, 1956.

150.110.
Enforcement of law as to mussels.

The commissioner and conservation officers may arrest without warrant anyone violating any of the provisions of KRS 150.520 or any of the rules and regulations made by the department for the protection of mussels under this chapter. They may inspect mussels in any warehouse, boat, store, car or receptacle when they have good cause to believe that any of the provisions of KRS 150.520 or any of the rules or regulations made thereunder have been or are being violated. This authority does not include the right to enter any dwelling house without a search warrant. When the officers find mussels in the possession of anyone in violation of this chapter, the mussels shall be confiscated and sold in the manner provided by KRS 150.120 for the sale of confiscated wildlife.

History.
1954d-50: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 11; 1952, ch. 200, § 18; 1966, ch. 255, § 144; 1968, ch. 38, § 5; 1978, ch. 384, § 31, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 265, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 413, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

150.120.
Seizure and sale of contraband.

The commissioner, all conservation officers, persons appointed by the commissioner, and all peace officers and their deputies shall seize and take possession of any and all furs, wildlife, guns, dogs, instruments, boats or devices which have been taken, used, transported or possessed contrary to any law or regulation adopted under this chapter. Upon complaint showing probable cause for believing that any of the wildlife protected by any law or regulation are illegally kept in any building, car or receptacle, any court having jurisdiction may issue a search warrant and cause the same to be searched. Any wildlife, furs, guns, dogs, instruments, or devices seized in accordance with this section shall be impounded by the arresting officer and shall be taken before the court trying the person arrested.

Upon conviction, the court trying the case shall have the discretion of determining whether or not any of the things seized under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall be declared contraband. Any wildlife, fur or dog taken, and any device used or possessed contrary to the provisions of this chapter, or any regulations adopted hereunder, is subject to being declared contraband. When any such item is declared contraband, the court shall enter an order accordingly. A copy of the order shall be forwarded to the commissioner and the contraband shall be placed in the custody of the arresting officer, to be delivered to the commissioner.

The commissioner may sell to the residents of this state, at the highest market price obtainable, with the approval of the Governor and the Finance and Administration Cabinet all contraband which comes to his possession under the order of any court, or which has been seized under this chapter and declared to be contraband under any law relating to fish or wildlife. All proceeds arising from the sale of contraband articles shall be paid into the game and fish fund. A record of the sale, including the name of the purchaser and the price paid, shall be kept by the commissioner.

Any device or contrivance, the use of which is not expressly recognized and sanctioned by the provisions of this chapter for the taking of wildlife, is hereby declared to be an illegal device. No person shall have in his possession any illegal device or other thing prohibited by law or by any regulation adopted under this chapter for the taking of wildlife.

History.
1954d-21, 1954d-27: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 12; 1948, ch. 78, § 5; 1952, ch. 200, § 19; 1956, ch. 115, § 9; 1986, ch. 265, § 4, effective July 15, 1986.

150.130.
County and Commonwealth’s attorneys to enforce laws and regulations.

All county attorneys and Commonwealth’s attorneys shall enforce the provisions of this chapter and all regulations adopted hereunder.

History.
1954d-22: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 13; 1948, ch. 78, § 6; 1952, ch. 200, § 20; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 17, § 44, effective January 1, 1978.

150.140.
Report and payment of moneys by circuit clerk.

Each circuit clerk responsible for the court before whom any prosecution under this chapter for the violation of any law or regulation for the protection of wildlife may be commenced or shall go on appeal shall, within ten (10) days after the end of each month, report in writing to the commissioner the result of the prosecution, the amount of fine collected or penalty imposed, if any. All moneys collected as fines or penalties for the violation of any law or regulation which, according to law, goes to the game and fish fund, shall be paid to the State Treasurer within ten (10) days after the end of each month and the same shall be paid by the State Treasurer into the game and fish fund within thirty (30) days thereafter.

History.
1954d-12: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 14; 1952, ch. 200, § 21; 1978, ch. 178, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 32, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 265, § 5, effective July 15, 1986.

150.150.
Game and fish fund — Mussel beds — Funds for hunger relief — Accounting and report — Contribution to Becoming an Outdoors-Woman Program.

Except as provided in this chapter, all moneys derived from the sale of licenses or from any other source connected with the administration of this chapter shall be promptly paid over to the State Treasurer, who shall deposit such moneys in a special fund, known as the game and fish fund, except that the moneys shall be entered under separate restricted fund accounts, not commingled, and maintained according to generally accepted accounting principles.
(1) (a)

Except as provided in this chapter, all moneys derived from the sale of licenses or from any other source connected with the administration of this chapter shall be promptly paid over to the State Treasurer, who shall deposit such moneys in a special fund, known as the game and fish fund, except that the moneys shall be entered under separate restricted fund accounts, not commingled, and maintained according to generally accepted accounting principles.

Moneys derived from the sale of licenses issued under this chapter shall be under separate restricted fund account from any other proceeds derived from this chapter or from proceeds obtained under any other chapter.

The game and fish fund:

Shall be used to:

Carry out the purposes of this chapter and any law or regulation for the protection of wildlife; and

Pay the annual supplement provided in KRS 15.460(1)(e) and

Shall not be used for any other purpose.

All funds received under KRS 150.110 and 150.520 shall be used by the department for the purpose of enforcing those sections and for the protection and propagation of mussel beds. Any surplus remaining in the fund at the close of each calendar year shall be turned into the general fund of the department.

In addition to the funds derived pursuant to KRS 186.050(15), the department shall, beginning August 1, 2006, and each fiscal year thereafter, set aside not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) from the game and fish fund for the purpose of promoting hunger relief through specific wildlife management and conservation efforts. The department shall provide for a separate accounting of these funds and shall, by October 1, 2007, and annually thereafter, report on the expenditures made pursuant to this subsection to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission.

The department shall prescribe a method to allow any applicant for a license required under KRS 150.175 to make, at the time of application, a voluntary contribution in the amount of two dollars ($2) for the Becoming an Outdoors-Woman Program or other hunter and angler recruitment and retention program. The voluntary contribution shall be deposited into a separate, restricted account within the game and fish fund. The Becoming an Outdoors-Woman Program shall encourage women in developing skills for outdoor recreational activities including but not limited to hunting and angling. The voluntary contribution shall be automatically added to the cost of the license at the time of sale.

HISTORY:
1954d-10, 1954d-48: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 15; 1952, ch. 200, § 22; 1968, ch. 38, § 6; 1978, ch. 384, § 33, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 265, § 6, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 413, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 2006, ch. 57, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 158, § 6, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 89, § 14, effective July 1, 2018.

150.152.
Report of audit of department by Auditor of Public Accounts.

Each year when the Auditor of Public Accounts conducts the statewide single audit of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, the Auditor of Public Accounts shall with respect to the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources:

Examine the separate revenue streams of each account within the game and fish fund to ensure compliance with the prohibition against commingling of funds;

Disaggregate and report the revenue and expenditures, by type, within the program income fund of the fish and game fund;

Identify internal controls, weaknesses, operating inefficiencies, and make recommendations for improvements; and

Submit a written report to the Interim Joint Committee on Natural Resources and Environment in conjunction with the release of the statewide single audit of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 158, § 1, effective July 15, 2010.

150.160.
Disposition of fines.

Sixty percent (60%) of a fine imposed for the violation of this chapter or KRS Chapter 235 shall, when collected, be paid into the game and fish fund.

History.
1954d-25, 1954d-26: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 16; 1952, ch. 200, § 23; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 17, § 45, effective January 1, 1978; 1998, ch. 275, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

150.165.
Nongame fish and wildlife fund.

There is established a special fund to be known as the “Nongame Fish and Wildlife Fund” which shall be under the control of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources Commission for the purpose of protecting and preserving nongame fish and wildlife and their habitat.

The nongame fish and wildlife fund shall consist of all moneys transferred to it under KRS 141.465, appropriations, donations, federal funds, other revenues designated for the fund from any source whatever, and all interest earned thereon.

Moneys contained in the nongame fish and wildlife fund shall be deemed a trust and agency account and shall not lapse and moneys contained in the fund shall be continuously appropriated for the purposes specified in this section.

The Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources Commission shall have access to and control of the moneys held in the nongame fish and wildlife fund, but shall expend such moneys only to protect and preserve nongame fish and wildlife and their habitat.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 121, § 5, effective July 15, 1980.

150.170.
Requirement of hunting, fishing, trapping, or guide’s license — Exceptions — Killing of wildlife causing damage — Reporting requirements — Reciprocity with adjoining states — Exception for active duty or reserve members on military property.

Except as provided in the following subsections of this section, and subject to administrative regulations promulgated under this chapter, no person, resident, or nonresident shall do any act authorized by any kind of license or permit or assist in any way any person in doing any act provided for in this chapter with respect to wildlife unless he holds the kind of license or permit, resident or nonresident, that authorizes the act. It shall be the specific purpose of this chapter to prohibit the taking or pursuing of any wildlife, protected or unprotected, or the fishing in any stream or body of water whether public or private, without first procuring the license provided for in KRS 150.175, except to the extent as may be otherwise provided in this section.

A person under sixteen (16) years of age may, without a sport fishing license, take fish by angling, or take minnows by the use of a minnow seine, minnow trap, or dip net.

A person under twelve (12) years of age shall be exempt from being required to obtain a sport hunting or sport trapping license as required by this chapter.

The resident owner of farmlands or his or her spouse or dependent children shall, without procuring any sport hunting or sport fishing licenses, have the right to take fish or hunt during the open season, except trapping, on the farmlands of which they are bona fide owners. Tenants or their dependent children residing upon these farmlands shall have the same privilege.

Residents or nonresidents observing and participating in field trials, training exercises, or other competitions as authorized by the department may observe and participate without obtaining a hunting or guide’s license so long as game is not taken.

Any resident serviceman on furlough of more than three (3) days in this state may, without any Kentucky sport hunting or sport fishing licenses, do any act authorized by the licenses, but while so doing he shall carry on his person proper identification and papers showing his furlough status.

Landowners, their spouses or dependent children, or their designee who must be approved by the commissioner, who kill or trap on their lands any wildlife causing damage to the lands or any personal property situated thereon shall not be required to have a hunting or trapping license and may do so during periods other than the open season for the particular species without a tag and dispose of the carcass on-site. Tenants, their spouses, their dependent children, or other persons approved by the commissioner, shall also have the same privilege. Upon destruction of any wildlife by the above-specified individuals, the act shall be reported to a conservation officer within twenty-four (24) hours of the kill. Individuals wishing to transport the carcass from the property upon which it was killed shall contact personnel of the department to request a disposal tag or other authorization. Inedible parts from wildlife taken under the authorization of this section shall not be utilized for any purpose and shall be destroyed or left afield. The department shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing procedures for the designee appointment process, including request and approval deadlines.

If a reciprocal agreement is entered into by the commissioner, with the approval of the commission, and promulgated as an administrative regulation by the department and similar action is taken by the appropriate authority in Missouri, Tennessee, Virginia, West Virginia, Indiana, Ohio, or Illinois, persons holding a resident or nonresident fishing or a resident or nonresident hunting license issued in these states shall be permitted to perform the acts authorized by the license upon certain contiguous waters and land areas adjacent to the common boundaries of the above-mentioned states and the State of Kentucky. A resident of the State of Kentucky shall purchase a proper Kentucky license to conform with the reciprocal agreement.

Any member of the Kentucky Army or Air National Guard, active duty or Reserve Component, in any branch in the United States Armed Forces that is based in the Commonwealth of Kentucky, shall have the right to take fish or hunt on any military property belonging to the Commonwealth without procuring any sport hunting or sport fishing license.

History.
1954d-13: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 68, § 17; 1944, ch. 110; 1944, ch. 124, § 2; 1946, ch. 84, § 2; 1948, ch. 78, § 7; 1952, ch. 200, § 24; 1956, ch. 115, § 10; 1966, ch. 256; 1968, ch. 38, § 7; 1968, ch. 95, § 1; 1970, ch. 92, § 27; 1972, ch. 273, § 2; 1974, ch. 386, § 29; 1984, ch. 320, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 7, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 265, § 7, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 273, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 40, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 90, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 353, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 181, § 99, effective April 4, 1994; 1996, ch. 112, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 133, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 274, § 1, effective March 1, 1999; 2002, ch. 173, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2008, ch. 42, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2011, ch. 12, § 1, effective June 8, 2011; 2014, ch. 19, § 1, effective July 15, 2014.

150.172.
Possession and use of firearm for self-defense and defense of others while hunting or trapping — Exceptions — Administrative regulations.

Any person who is not prohibited by state or federal law from possessing a firearm may carry a firearm and ammunition for that firearm for purposes of self-defense and defense of others while hunting, fishing, trapping, or engaging in any other activity not constituting a crime under KRS Chapter 218A or Chapters 500 to 534, and may do so on any public lands under the control of the department and on any private land under the control of the department, unless the owner of the private land has posted notice that concealed deadly weapons are not allowed in a building where they may be prohibited pursuant to KRS 237.110 or 237.115.

A person may use a firearm, if he or she is not prohibited by state or federal law from possessing a firearm, or may use any other deadly weapon, at any time and during any season to:
(2) (a)

A person may use a firearm, if he or she is not prohibited by state or federal law from possessing a firearm, or may use any other deadly weapon, at any time and during any season to:

Kill or attempt to kill an animal, whether protected or unprotected, in self-defense or defense of another person; or

Kill or attempt to kill an injured animal for humane purposes; and

An investigation by the department shall be authorized to substantiate and provide evidence on whether the kill or attempted kill of the animal is in violation of paragraph (a) of this subsection or if the animal presents a threat to public health and safety. If no violation is shown to exist, and if there is no threat to public health and safety, then the animal or parts thereof shall:

Remain the property and in the possession of the person taking the animal; or

If the animal or parts thereof were surrendered to the department, be immediately returned to the person.

An arrest shall not be made, except upon a warrant issued by a judge of a court of competent jurisdiction, and a citation shall not be issued by a peace officer if an animal is killed under circumstances described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.

A citation may be issued by a peace officer who witnesses the killing of an animal in violation of a statute or federal regulation under circumstances different from those described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.

An arrest warrant or a summons may be issued by a judge of a court of competent jurisdiction, upon application of the appropriate county attorney, if the court believes that there is sufficient cause to doubt the claim that the animal was killed under circumstances described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.

In cases where an animal is killed and there is a claim that the animal was killed under circumstances described in paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section, the department shall provide competent evidence as to how the animal was killed and the circumstances surrounding the event.

The department shall not promulgate administrative regulations restricting any right provided by this section or the spirit thereof.

This section shall not apply to the killing, wounding, or other prohibited act relating to specific wildlife which are protected by the federal Endangered Species Act, 16 U.S.C. secs. 1531 to 1544; federal Migratory Bird Treaty Act, 16 U.S.C. secs. 703 to 712; or federal Bald and Golden Eagle Protection Act, 16 U.S.C. secs. 668 to 668d.

The principles contained in KRS Chapter 503 relating to the use of force and deadly force against human beings shall apply to acts where wildlife is involved.

in either event, reports the kill or attempted kill to a conservation officer before midnight of the same day as the kill or attempted kill.

History.
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 158, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; 2019 ch. 115, § 4, effective June 27, 2019.

150.175.
Kinds of licenses and tags — Multiyear licenses or permits.

The kinds of licenses and tags authorized by this chapter, and the acts authorized to be performed under the licenses and tags, subject to the other provisions of this chapter and subject to administrative regulations promulgated under this chapter, shall be as follows:

Statewide resident sport fishing license, which authorizes the holder to take fishes by angling, or take crayfish by a minnow seine, or by hand, to take minnows by the use of a minnow seine, minnow trap, or dip net, or to take fishes by grabbing, gigging, snagging, snaring, jugging, and bow and arrow, and to take frogs and turtles from any waters in any county of this state open for such purposes and subject to the limitations in this chapter and additional limitations that the department may from time to time prescribe. This license shall not authorize the holder to sell fish;

A short-term sport fishing license, which authorizes the holder to perform all acts authorized by a statewide sport fishing license and subject to the same limitations or prescribed administrative regulations. This license shall not authorize the holder to sell fish;

A resident commercial fishing license and a nonresident commercial fishing license, which authorize a holder to perform any act authorized by a sport fishing license and to take rough fishes from the waters of the state by the use of commercial fishing gear as prescribed by administrative regulation. The license shall also authorize the holder to sell rough fishes, other than those protected by administrative regulation;

A commercial fishing gear tag, which shall be attached to each piece of commercial fishing gear including hoop nets, slat traps, trotline, wing nets, and to each one hundred (100) feet of linear gear or portion thereof in use, including commercial seines, gill nets, or trammel nets. Commercial gear tags may be issued only to a person holding a resident or nonresident commercial fishing license;

Live fish and bait dealer’s licenses, resident and nonresident, which authorize the holder to sell bait and live fish as may be prescribed by administrative regulation;

Musseling licenses, resident and nonresident, which authorize the holder to take mussels for commercial purposes as may be prescribed by administrative regulation;

A statewide resident hunting license, which authorizes the holder to take or pursue wild animals, wild birds, frogs, and turtles with gun, bow and arrow, dog, or falcon, or to participate in a fox-hunting party engaged in the hunting or pursuing of foxes with dogs for sport, according to the provisions of the laws and administrative regulations of the department;

A junior statewide hunting license, which may be issued to a person before he or she has reached his or her sixteenth birthday, and which authorizes the holder to exercise all the privileges authorized by a statewide hunting license. No junior hunting license shall be issued without the written permission of parent, guardian, or person having custody of the person under sixteen (16) years of age;

Trapping licenses, resident and nonresident, which authorize the holder to take wild animals by trapping upon his or her own lands or upon the lands of another person, if the holder of the license has first obtained oral or written consent as provided in KRS 150.092 and administrative regulation;

A taxidermist license, which authorizes the holder to engage in the act of preparing, stuffing, and mounting the skins of wildlife;

A commercial guide’s license, which authorizes the holder to guide hunting and fishing parties according to the provisions of the laws and administrative regulations of the department;

Fur buyer’s licenses, resident and nonresident, which authorize the holder to buy raw furs from licensed trappers and hunters and to sell raw furs so purchased. Applicants for the license shall state the number of premises to be used and shall display at each a copy of the license as furnished by the department, except that the commissioner may limit the number of copies furnished and may revoke the license for violation;

A fur processor’s license, which may be issued only to a resident, a partnership, firm, or corporation of this state and which authorizes the holder to buy raw furs when in legal possession for processing, manufacture, or retention in cold storage or for resale;

A nonresident sport fishing license, which authorizes the holder to perform any act authorized by a resident statewide sport fishing license. This license shall not authorize the holder to sell fish;

A nonresident annual hunting license, which authorizes the holder to perform any act authorized by a resident statewide hunting license;

Shoot-to-retrieve field trial permits, four (4) day and single day, which authorize a permit holder to conduct a shoot-to-retrieve field trial on private or government-owned lands. With a four (4) day permit, all participants, whether residents or nonresidents, shall not be required to possess any other license to participate in the permitted field trial, and the permit shall expire four (4) days after the date on which the field trial began. With the single day permit, the permit is valid for one (1) day and all participants shall have a valid resident or nonresident annual Kentucky hunting license. A permit is not required to conduct a shoot-to-retrieve field trial on a licensed shooting preserve; however, all participants that take or attempt to take game shall have in their possession a resident or nonresident annual Kentucky hunting license;

Game permits and junior game permits, which, in combination with a valid statewide hunting license or a valid junior statewide hunting license, authorize the holder to take or pursue the specified game species in any designated open area of this state, during the open season and according to the provisions of the laws and administrative regulations governing the hunting;

A combination hunting and fishing license, which authorizes only resident holders to perform all acts valid under either a sport fishing or hunting license;

A trout permit, which in combination with a valid statewide fishing license, authorizes the holder to take trout by angling or as may be prescribed by administrative regulation;

A commercial waterfowl permit, which authorizes the holder to establish and operate a commercial waterfowl hunting preserve;

A short-term hunting license, which authorizes the holder to perform all acts authorized by a statewide hunting license according to the provisions of the laws and administrative regulations of the department;

A joint statewide resident sport fishing license issued to a husband and wife which authorizes them to take fish as provided in subsection (1) of this section. The license fee for this joint license shall be ten percent (10%) less than the license fee set by the commission for two (2) statewide resident sport fishing licenses;

A Kentucky migratory bird permit, which in combination with a valid statewide hunting license and compliance with applicable federal law, authorizes the holder to take or pursue waterfowl and migratory shore or upland game birds;

A pay lake license which authorizes the holder to operate privately owned impounded waters for fishing purposes for which a fee is charged;

A senior combination hunting and fishing license, which authorizes the holder to perform all acts valid under a sport fishing license, a sport hunting license, or a state permit to take deer, turkey, trout, waterfowl, or migratory shore or upland game birds, and which shall be available to a Kentucky resident who is sixty-five (65) years of age or older.

A senior lifetime combination hunting and fishing license, which remains valid until the death of the holder and authorizes the holder to perform all acts valid under a sport fishing license, a sport hunting license, and a state permit to take deer, turkey, trout, waterfowl, and migratory shore and upland game birds, and which shall be available to a Kentucky resident who is sixty-five (65) years of age or older;

A disabled combination hunting and fishing license, which authorizes the holder to perform all acts valid under a sport fishing license, a sport hunting license, and a state permit to take deer, turkey, trout, waterfowl, and migratory shore and upland game birds, and which shall be available to a Kentucky resident who is:

An American veteran at least fifty percent (50%) disabled as a result of a service-connected disability; or

Declared permanently and totally disabled by the federal Social Security Administration, the United States Office of Personnel Management, the Kentucky Teachers’ Retirement System, the Department of Workers’ Claims or its equivalent from another state, or the United States Railroad Retirement Board.

A sportsman’s license for residents that includes an annual hunting and fishing license and such permits as allowed by administrative regulations promulgated by the department; and

A special license for residents and nonresidents for the purpose of hunting on licensed shooting areas. This license shall be valid only for the shooting areas for which it was issued and shall remain in effect for one (1) year. If the hunter holds either a nonresident or resident statewide hunting license for the current year, the special license shall not be required.

The senior combination license shall not be valid unless the holder carries proof of residency and proof of age , as the department may require by administrative regulation, on his or her person while performing an act authorized by the license;

The disabled combination license shall not be valid unless the holder carries proof of residency and proof of disability, as the department may require by administrative regulation, on his or her person while performing an act authorized by the license;

The department may offer multiyear licenses or permits for any of the annual licenses or permits authorized in subsections (1), (7), (9), (14), (15), (17), (18), (19), (23), and (28) of this section. A multiyear license or permit shall authorize the holder to perform all acts authorized by the same license or permit if purchased annually and shall be issued in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the administrative regulations promulgated hereunder. Any multiyear licenses or permits offered by the department relating to the annual licenses or permits authorized in subsections (1), (7), (9), (14), (15), (17), (18), (19), (23), and (28) of this section shall be implemented by administrative regulation and may be discontinued at any time.

History.
Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 84, § 3; 1948, ch. 76, § 1; 1948, ch. 77, § 3; 1948, ch. 78, § 8; 1952, ch. 200, § 25; 1956, ch. 115, § 11; 1958, ch. 166, § 1; 1968, ch. 38, § 8; 1972, ch. 273, § 3; 1978, ch. 178, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 34, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 351, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 111, § 82, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 220, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 365, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 474, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 353, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 239, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 268, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 274, § 2, effective March 1, 1999; 2000, ch. 35, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 459, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 212, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2008, ch. 42, § 2, effective July 15, 2008; 2009, ch. 20, § 2, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 175, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 50, § 1, effective June 25, 2013.

150.176.
Licenses to nonresidents conditioned on reciprocity. [Repealed.]

150.177.
Special permit for incorporated nonprofit wildlife conservation organization.

In addition to the game permits issued under KRS 150.175, the commission may issue a special permit to an incorporated nonprofit wildlife conservation organization. The commission shall promulgate administrative regulations governing the number of special permits to be issued per year per species for which a game permit is required. An organization that receives a special permit issued under this section may sell and transfer the permit if all proceeds of the sale are used in Kentucky for wildlife management.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 35, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 85, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 127, § 3, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 110, § 2, effective June 26, 2007.

150.178.
Cooperator permits — Administrative regulations.

In addition to the game permits issued under KRS 150.175, the commission may promulgate administrative regulations allowing the issuance of cooperator permits to individuals or entities who enroll land with the department for public hunting and meet all applicable regulatory requirements. An individual or entity that receives a cooperator permit issued under this section may sell or transfer the permit.

History.
Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 110, § 1, effective June 26, 2007.

150.179.
Waiver of license requirement and discounting of licenses or permits for event supporting a recreational activity — Free-fishing weekend.

In this section, “recreational activity” means hunting, fishing, or trapping for sport.

For an event or program supporting a recreational activity, the commission may waive the requirement that participants hold licenses, or may discount licenses or permits, required under this chapter if the commission finds that:

The special event or program will provide education in or appreciation of the recreational activity; and

The waiver of the license requirement will not result in a substantial loss of revenue to the department.

The department shall, for one (1) weekend each year, suspend enforcement of the requirement that persons fishing in the waters of the Commonwealth buy and hold a license.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 35, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2009, ch. 20, § 3, effective June 25, 2009.